Utah statutes.
26-36a-205.   Medicaid hospital inpatient access payments.
(1)  To preserve and improve access to hospitals, the division shall make
Medicaid inpatient hospital access payments to hospitals in accordance with
this section, Section 26-36a-204, and Subsection 26-36a-203(7).
(2) (a)  The Medicaid inpatient hospital access payment amount to a particular
hospital shall be established by the division.
(b)  The aggregate of all hospital's Medicaid inpatient hospital access
payments shall be:
(i)  equal to the upper payment limit gap for inpatient services for all
hospitals; and
(ii)  designated as the Medicaid inpatient hospital access payment pool.
(3)  In addition to any other funds paid to hospitals during fiscal years 2010
and 2011 for inpatient hospital services to Medicaid patients, a Medicaid
hospital inpatient access payment shall be made:
(a)  for state fiscal years 2010 and 2011:
(i)  the amount of $825 per Medicaid fee for service day, to a hospital that:
(A)  was not a specialty hospital; and
(B)  had less than 300 select access inpatient cases during state fiscal year
2008; and
(ii)  inpatient hospital access payments as determined by dividing the
remaining spending room available in the current year UPL, after offsetting
the payments authorized under Subsection (3)(a)(i) by the total 2008 Medicaid
inpatient hospital payments, multiplied by the hospital's Medicaid inpatient
payments for state fiscal year 2008, exclusive of medical education and
Medicaid disproportionate share payments;
(b)  for state fiscal year 2012, using state fiscal year 2009 paid Medicaid
inpatient claims data; and
(c)  for state fiscal year 2013, using state fiscal year 2010 paid Medicaid
inpatient claims data.
(4)  For both state fiscal years 2012 and 2013, the division shall submit
adjustments to the payment rates in Subsection (3)(a) to the Hospital Policy
Review Board for their review.
(5)  Medicaid inpatient hospital access payments shall be made:
(a)  on a quarterly basis for inpatient hospital services furnished to
Medicaid individuals during each quarter; and
(b)  within 15 days after the end of each quarter.
(6)  A hospital's Medicaid inpatient access payment shall not be used to
offset any other payment by Medicaid for hospital inpatient or outpatient
services to Medicaid beneficiaries, including a:
(a)  fee-for-service payment;
(b)  per diem payment;
(c)  hospital inpatient adjustment; or
(d)  cost settlement payment.
(7)  A hospital shall not be guaranteed that the hospital's Medicaid inpatient
hospital access payments will equal or exceed the amount of the hospital's
assessment.
